Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
147

GRADES AND
STANDARDS

Part I. Fresh Fruits, Vegetables, Nuts,
Honey,

and Coffee

Section

147-1 Definitions

147-2 Duties of department; violations;
proceedings;

penalties

147-3 Repealed

147-4 Rules

147-5 Prohibition of deceptive packing

147-6 Repealed

147-7 Inspection and classification of
agricultural

commodities; fees

147-7.5 Repealed

147-8 Appeal for classification; fee

147-9 Certificate as evidence

147-10 Income from certification and agriculture
control

activities

Part II. Exports: Fruits, Vegetables,
Nuts, Coffee,

and Honey

147-21 Definitions

147-22 Rules

147-23 Prohibited acts

147-24 Inspection

147-25 Duties of department; violations;
proceedings;

penalties

Part III. Exports: Flowers and Foliage

147-31 Definitions

147-32 Rules and regulations

147-33 Prohibited acts

147-34 Inspection; certification fees

147-35, 36 Repealed

147-37 Duties of department; violations;
proceedings;

penalties

Part IV. Processed Food

147-51 Definitions

147-52 Grades, standards and classifications;
changes

147-53 Department; grades, standards and
classifications;

factors

147-54 Department, consideration of use

147-55 Department, notice of hearing

147-56 Department, hearing, determination

147-57 Department, rules and regulations,
contracts,

cooperation, fees

147-58 Department; inspections, etc.; request
necessary

147-59 Continuous factory inspection; request
necessary;

labels or marks

147-60 Certificate, appeal to department

147-61 Certificate, prima facie evidence

147-62 Misrepresentation as to grade, etc., penalties

147-63 Remedies, extension of other powers

147-64 Deposit of moneys

Part V. Chicken Eggs

147-71 Words and phrases defined

147-72 Sale of bad eggs

147-73 Enforcement

147-74 Grading standards and regulations

147-75 Notice of grade and size; designation of

origin of imported eggs

147-76 Advertisement of eggs and price

147-77 Signs and labels on cartons, crates, etc.

147-78 Seller's invoice

147-79 Penalties

147-80 Administrative penalties

147-81 Remedies and penalties not exclusive

Part VI. Beef, Pork, and Poultry Carcasses

147-91 Standard grades; rules and regulations

147-92 Federal standards

147-93 Cooperating with federal authority

147-94 Grading voluntary

147-95 Regulation of advertising

147-96 Public hearings

147-97 Disposition of fees

Part VII. Certification Services Revolving
Fund

147-101 Certification services revolving fund

147-102 Certification and audit services

Part VIII. Agricultural Safety and Security

147-111 Definitions

147-112 Cooperative agreements and contracts to
provide

auditing and certification services

147-113 Audits and certification; requests
necessary

147-114 Fees and deposit of moneys

147-115 Certificate as evidence

147-116 Hawaii good agricultural practices program

Part IX. Seed Certification

147-121 Official certifying agency

147-122 Definitions

147-123 Cooperative agreements and contracts to
provide

agricultural crop certification services

147-124 Certification; requests necessary

147-125 Rules

147-126 Fees and deposit of moneys

147-127 Certificate as evidence

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next